ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
# rule/flag 1413 (affects 51506 words, has 179 subrules):
flag n:
	U D	>	-D,KSKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IDKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IGA
	A G A	>	-GA,IGAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IKSKI
	A G A	>	-GA,ILEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,ILGI
	A G A	>	-GA,ILTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IM
	U G A	>	-GA,IMA
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAD
	U G A	>	-GA,IMADKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAGA
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAGAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAID
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAIDKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAIGA
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAIGAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAIKS
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAIKSKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAIL
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAILE
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAILEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAILGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAILT
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAILTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAINA
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAINAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAINI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAINIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAIS
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAISKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAISSE
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAISSEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAIST
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAISTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAITA
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAITAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAKS
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAKSKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAL
	U G A	>	-GA,IMALE
	U G A	>	-GA,IMALEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMALGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMALT
	U G A	>	-GA,IMALTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMANA
	U G A	>	-GA,IMANAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMANI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMANIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAS
	U G A	>	-GA,IMASKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMASSE
	U G A	>	-GA,IMASSEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAST
	U G A	>	-GA,IMASTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMAT
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATA
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATE
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATEGA
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATEGAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATEKS
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATEKSKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATEL
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATELE
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATELEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATELGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATELT
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATELTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATENA
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATENAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATENI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATENIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATES
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATESKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATESSE
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATESSEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATEST
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATESTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATETA
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATETAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMATKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IMGI
	A G A	>	-GA,INA
	A G A	>	-GA,INAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,INI
	A G A	>	-GA,INIGI
	A G A	>	-GA,ISKI
	A G A	>	-GA,ISSEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,ISTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,ITA
	A G A	>	-GA,ITAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,L
	E G A	>	-GA,LE
	E G A	>	-GA,LT
	I G A	>	-GA,M
	I G A	>	-GA,MA
	I G A	>	-GA,MAD
	I G A	>	-GA,MADKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAGA
	I G A	>	-GA,MAGAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAID
	I G A	>	-GA,MAIDKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAIGA
	I G A	>	-GA,MAIGAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAIKS
	I G A	>	-GA,MAIKSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAIL
	I G A	>	-GA,MAILE
	I G A	>	-GA,MAILEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAILGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAILT
	I G A	>	-GA,MAILTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAINA
	I G A	>	-GA,MAINAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAINI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAINIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAIS
	I G A	>	-GA,MAISKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAISSE
	I G A	>	-GA,MAISSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAIST
	I G A	>	-GA,MAISTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAITA
	I G A	>	-GA,MAITAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAKS
	I G A	>	-GA,MAKSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAL
	I G A	>	-GA,MALE
	I G A	>	-GA,MALEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MALGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MALT
	I G A	>	-GA,MALTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MANA
	I G A	>	-GA,MANAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MANI
	I G A	>	-GA,MANIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAS
	I G A	>	-GA,MASKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MASSE
	I G A	>	-GA,MASSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAST
	I G A	>	-GA,MASTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MAT
	I G A	>	-GA,MATA
	I G A	>	-GA,MATAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATE
	I G A	>	-GA,MATEGA
	I G A	>	-GA,MATEGAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATEKS
	I G A	>	-GA,MATEKSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATEL
	I G A	>	-GA,MATELE
	I G A	>	-GA,MATELEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATELGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATELT
	I G A	>	-GA,MATELTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATENA
	I G A	>	-GA,MATENAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATENI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATENIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATES
	I G A	>	-GA,MATESKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATESSE
	I G A	>	-GA,MATESSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATEST
	I G A	>	-GA,MATESTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATETA
	I G A	>	-GA,MATETAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,MATKI
	I G A	>	-GA,MGI
	E G A	>	-GA,S
	E G A	>	-GA,SSE
	E G A	>	-GA,ST

# rule/flag 1658 (affects 17417 words, has 119 subrules):
flag o:
	U D	>	-D,VATKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IDKI
	U G A	>	-GA,IGA
	U G A	>	-GA,IGAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,IKSKI
	U G A	>	-GA,ILEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,ILGI
	U G A	>	-GA,ILTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IM
	E G A	>	-GA,IMA
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAD
	E G A	>	-GA,IMADKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAGA
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAGAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAID
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAIDKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAIGA
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAIGAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAIKS
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAIKSKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAIL
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAILE
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAILEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAILGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAILT
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAILTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAINA
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAINAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAINI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAINIGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAIS
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAISKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAISSE
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAISSEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAIST
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAISTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAITA
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAITAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAKS
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAKSKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAL
	E G A	>	-GA,IMALE
	E G A	>	-GA,IMALEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMALGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMALT
	E G A	>	-GA,IMALTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMANA
	E G A	>	-GA,IMANAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMANI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMANIGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAS
	E G A	>	-GA,IMASKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMASSE
	E G A	>	-GA,IMASSEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAST
	E G A	>	-GA,IMASTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMAT
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATA
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATE
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATEGA
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATEGAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATEKS
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATEKSKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATEL
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATELE
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATELEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATELGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATELT
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATELTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATENA
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATENAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATENI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATENIGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATES
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATESKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATESSE
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATESSEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATEST
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATESTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATETA
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATETAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMATKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IMGI
	U G A	>	-GA,INA
	U G A	>	-GA,INAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,INI
	U G A	>	-GA,INIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,ISKI
	U G A	>	-GA,ISSEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,ISTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,ITA
	U G A	>	-GA,ITAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,TE
	I G A	>	-GA,TEGA
	A G A	>	-GA,TEGAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,TEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,TEKS
	A G A	>	-GA,TEKSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,TEL
	I G A	>	-GA,TELE
	A G A	>	-GA,TELEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,TELGI
	I G A	>	-GA,TELT
	A G A	>	-GA,TELTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,TENA
	A G A	>	-GA,TENAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,TENI
	A G A	>	-GA,TENIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,TES
	A G A	>	-GA,TESKI
	I G A	>	-GA,TESSE
	A G A	>	-GA,TESSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,TEST
	A G A	>	-GA,TESTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,TETA
	A G A	>	-GA,TETAGI

# rule/flag 5289 (affects 6989 words, has 34 subrules):
flag p:
	A	>	DE
	A	>	DEGA
	A	>	DEGAGI
	A	>	DEGI
	A	>	DEKS
	A	>	DEKSKI
	A	>	DEL
	A	>	DELE
	A	>	DELEGI
	A	>	DELGI
	A	>	DELT
	A	>	DELTKI
	A	>	DENA
	A	>	DENAGI
	A	>	DENI
	A	>	DENIGI
	A	>	DES
	A	>	DESKI
	A	>	DESSE
	A	>	DESSEGI
	A	>	DEST
	A	>	DESTKI
	A	>	DETA
	A	>	DETAGI
	U D	>	-D,MA
	U D	>	-D,MAGI
	U D	>	-D,MAKS
	U D	>	-D,MAKSKI
	U D	>	-D,MAS
	U D	>	-D,MASKI
	U D	>	-D,MAST
	U D	>	-D,MASTKI
	U D	>	-D,MATA
	U D	>	-D,MATAGI

# rule/flag 6702 (affects 9716 words, has 32 subrules):
flag q:
	A	>	V
	A	>	VGI
	A	>	VUS
	A	>	VUSKI
	A	>	VUSSE
	A	>	VUSSEGI
	A	>	VUST
	A	>	VUSTKI
	U D	>	-D,TEGA
	U D	>	-D,TEGAGI
	U D	>	-D,TEKS
	U D	>	-D,TEKSKI
	U D	>	-D,TEL
	U D	>	-D,TELE
	U D	>	-D,TELEGI
	U D	>	-D,TELGI
	U D	>	-D,TELT
	U D	>	-D,TELTKI
	U D	>	-D,TENA
	U D	>	-D,TENAGI
	U D	>	-D,TENI
	U D	>	-D,TENIGI
	U D	>	-D,TES
	U D	>	-D,TESKI
	U D	>	-D,TESSE
	U D	>	-D,TESSEGI
	U D	>	-D,TEST
	U D	>	-D,TESTKI
	U D	>	-D,TETA
	U D	>	-D,TETAGI
	[AI] N E	>	-NE,ST
	[AI] N E	>	-NE,STKI

# rule/flag 6746 (affects 14328 words, has 42 subrules):
flag r:
	A	>	B
	I	>	DKI
	A	>	KSID
	A	>	KSIME
	A	>	KSIN
	A	>	KSITE
	A	>	ME
	I	>	MEGI
	A	>	N
	I	>	NGI
	S	>	SEGI
	I	>	TEGI
	U D	>	-D,ID
	U D	>	-D,IDKI
	U D	>	-D,IGA
	U D	>	-D,IGAGI
	U D	>	-D,IKS
	U D	>	-D,IKSKI
	U D	>	-D,IL
	U D	>	-D,ILE
	U D	>	-D,ILEGI
	U D	>	-D,ILGI
	U D	>	-D,ILT
	U D	>	-D,ILTKI
	U D	>	-D,INA
	U D	>	-D,INAGI
	U D	>	-D,INI
	U D	>	-D,INIGI
	U D	>	-D,IS
	U D	>	-D,ISKI
	U D	>	-D,ISSE
	U D	>	-D,ISSEGI
	U D	>	-D,IST
	U D	>	-D,ISTKI
	U D	>	-D,ITA
	U D	>	-D,ITAGI
	[AEILRUV] N E	>	-NE,SUS
	[AEILRUV] N E	>	-NE,SUSKI
	[AEILRUV] N E	>	-NE,SUSSE
	[AEILRUV] N E	>	-NE,SUSSEGI
	[AEILRUV] N E	>	-NE,SUST
	[AEILRUV] N E	>	-NE,SUSTKI
