ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
ambitsioonikaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
anaalne/ar
arbunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
arssinane/aqrt
asjastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
askeetlikega/ajlmny
autentsus/arsuw
bukvalistlikega/ajlmny
demoraliseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
dreeninud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
duellinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
eelistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
eelmisustega/almny
erendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ergunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
esildistega/almny
flekteerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
galvanokaustilisega/abdhjlmny
galvanosteegiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
haigenenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
haugjustega/almny
heegeldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
heletanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
heroiseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hirmutatuga/abcdefgikmoy
hukane/aqr
huljutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hävinenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hõõgutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ideaalne/ar
illikesustega/almny
imalaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
imestlenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jalakane/aqrt
jantlemisega/abhlmny
jonksutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jäisus/arsuw
jändavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kaapmega/abcefhiklmny
kaeta/aq
kappinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
karburaatoriga/abcehijlmoy
kardavusega/abehklmny
kategooriline/aqrt
keelitlenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kilkajaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kirisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kiselnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kivinenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kivistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
komöödiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kongrueerunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
koorinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
korgistunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
koskedega/almny
krookinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kubatuursega/abcdefhjklmnoy
kuulnud/abcdhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
käianud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kärmendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõhukustega/almny
kõlbavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kütnud/abcdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
küünitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lahistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lapituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
lemmega/abcefghiklmny
leostanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
liisunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
liputanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
logedaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
loosimine/aqt
lõhastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lõpmistega/almny
lõõskamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
lössitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lösutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mitmestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
modernitsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mudastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
muhatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
murinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
möögatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
müüsriga/abcehijlmoy
neljutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nisaline/aqrt
nokkadega/almny
nudistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
näosega/abdehjklmnoy
ohootanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
olustikuline/aqrt
orientaalne/ar
pahviga/acefijklny
paisanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
patsunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pesitsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
piiksutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
piirlematuga/abcdefgkmoy
pitsitusega/abhilmny
plekkinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
priisanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
prillitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pruunistunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
puhastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
puusalisega/abdhjlmny
põlvnenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pügaldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
püherdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rahmeldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
retseptoorsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
rihvalistega/almny
rohminud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ruigatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
röstinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rüsinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sasistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sebinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
selgsus/arsuw
sildamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
soolane/aqr
sopsunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
spirituaalega/almny
stabiliseerunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
stsenaariumiga/abcefhijklmoy
süngestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
süüdistatavaga/abcdefgijklmnoy
süüdivus/arsuw
tahhükardiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
talvine/aqr
tikliga/abcehijlmoy
tohletanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
toksanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tormilisustega/almny
tuigutavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
tunnuseline/aqrt
täkutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tõhustunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tülgastavustega/almny
vakatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
valmitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
varjutunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vastaline/aqrt
versifikatsioonega/almny
visisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
voogelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
võõrandanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vöödega/almn
ärplematuga/abcdefgkmoy
õhuksus/arsuw
õnnistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
